Hawaii statutes.
[§844D-23] Repository of samples and
records. (a) The department may designate itself or other appropriate
entities to serve as repositories for blood specimens and buccal swab and other
biological samples, and the designated entity shall analyze specimens and
samples, and store, compile, correlate, compare, maintain, and use DNA and
forensic identification profiles and records related to the following:

(1) Forensic casework and forensics unknown;

(2) Known and evidentiary specimens and samples from
crime scenes or criminal investigations;

(3) Missing or unidentified persons;

(4) Persons required to provide specimens, samples,
or print impressions under this chapter;

(5) Legally obtained samples; and

(6) Anonymous DNA records used for training, research,
statistical analysis of populations, quality assurance, or quality control.

(b) The designated entity shall include files
as necessary to implement this chapter.

(c) Nothing in this section shall be construed
as requiring the designated entity to provide specimens or samples for quality
control or other purposes to those who request specimens or samples.

(d) Samples, specimens, or profiles to be
submitted for the state DNA database and data bank identification program shall
include information as required by the department for ensuring search
capabilities and compliance with National DNA Index System standards. [L 2005,
c 112, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol14_Ch0701-0853
Next